New Jersey, session 221, A4888.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    The Legislature finds and declares that: a.     Artificial Intelligence (AI) represents both a threat and an opportunity to the workforce of the State of New Jersey. b.    Actions must be taken to develop an understanding of the potential impacts on the labor market, create strategies to mitigate any job losses, and identify areas where AI can create new workforce opportunities. c.     Funding should be made available to assist displaced workers and support the transition to new workforce opportunities. d.    The establishment of a commission is appropriate to examine how AI will impact New Jerseys workforce. 2.    As used in this act: AI means artificial intelligence, a technology that allows computers and the enabling software to perform complex tasks and simulate human learning, decision-making, and problem-solving. AI Impact Research means studies that examine the evolving role of AI in the labor market and quantify the risks and opportunities of the evolving technology. Commission means the AI and Labor Study Commission established pursuant to this act. Commissioner means the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development. Job Transition Fund means a fund established to support displaced workers and aid skills development to new AI-driven roles through education, training, and job placement services. State job training funds means any moneys expended from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund created pursuant to section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9) or any other source of State moneys to provide education, employment and training for workers impacted by AI. 3.    There is created in the Department of Labor and Workforce Development the AI and Labor Market Study Commission. a.     The commission shall consist of 11 members, as follows: (1)   The Commissioners of Community Affairs, Education, and Labor and Workforce Development and the Chief Technology Officer of the Office of Information Technology or their designees, shall serve as ex officio members. (2)   Seven members of the commission shall be private citizens appointed by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development.  Not more than four of the members appointed by the commissioner shall be of the same political party.  At least four shall be individuals with expertise in AI technology.  The remaining members shall have expertise in technology, business administration, economics, employment training, or labor. b.    Each member shall hold office for a term of three years or until a successor is appointed and qualified.  A member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring in the membership of the board for any reason other than the expiration of the term shall have an appointment for the unexpired term only.  All vacancies shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment.  A member may be appointed for any number of successive terms. c.     Appointments made to the commission shall be made within 60 days after the effective date of this act.  The commissioner shall select a chairperson who shall be a nongovernmental member of the commission who will convene the first organizational meeting within 45 days after the appointment of its members and shall appoint a secretary who need not be a member of the commission.  The committee shall meet on a quarterly basis. d.    Members of the board shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties. 4.    The purpose of the commission shall be to coordinate the creation of AI Impact Research which will:  assist in understanding the impact of AI on the workforce; identify high risk jobs; create strategies to address potential job displacement; identify new job opportunities that leverage AI skills; and recommend policy actions and spending programs which would address methods to assist displaced workers and support new AI-related workforce opportunities. 5.    The commission shall: a.     Engage with technology experts and sponsor studies as necessary to understand the potential impacts of AI on the New Jersey Workforce. b.    Identify high risk jobs, including those mostly likely to result in displacement due to AI in the next six to18 months. c.     Develop programs to assist displaced workers with enhanced training opportunities. d.    Coordinate activities between the Department of Education and the Department of Labor and Workforce Development to implement the tactical and strategic actions recommended by the commission. This shall include monitoring the actual and projected expenditures of the Job Transition Fund. e.     Provide a summary report to the Governor and, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-24 19.1), to the Legislature not less than two times per calendar year concerning the activities of the commission, which shall include the commissions findings regarding the potential impact of AI on the workforce and any recommended actions. 6.    The Job Transition Fund is hereby established to support displaced workers and enable transitions to new AI-driven roles through education, training, State job training funds, and job placement services.  The fund shall be used for strategic and tactical initiatives identified by the commissions research activities, and shall be administered by the Commissioner of Labor and Workforce Development.  The commission shall provide recommended program funding that advances specific targeted outcomes related to education, training, and workplace transitions.  The initial funding source for this program shall be sourced from the Workforce Development Partnership Fund, pursuant to the provisions established by section 9 of P.L.1992, c.43 (C.34:15D-9) to direct a portion of the program to training services. 7.    This act shall take effect immediately.